apertium_magahi_in_canonical_form.dix
<?xml version="1.0"?>
<!-- Generated canonical form dictionary -->
<dictionary>
<alphabet>abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyzABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZ</alphabet>
<sdefs>
<sdef n="cat:n" c="Noun"/>
<sdef n="cat:p" c="Pronoun"/>
<sdef n="cat:v" c="verb"/>
<sdef n="cat:vn" c="verbal noun"/>  
<sdef n="cat:adj" c="Adjective"/>
<sdef n="cat:sh" c="shashthi"/>
<sdef n="cat:prsg" c="parsarg(ViBakwi-PostPosition)"/>
<sdef n="cat:cnj" c="conjunction"/>
<sdef n="cat:prawyaya" c="prawyaya"/>

<sdef n="gen:m" c="masculine"/>
<sdef n="gen:f" c="feminine"/>
<sdef n="gen:ne" c="neutor"/>
<sdef n="gen:na" c="not applicable"/>

<sdef n="case:d" c="direct"/>
<sdef n="case:o" c="oblique"/>
<sdef n="case:gen" c="genitive"/>
<!-- <sdef n="case:Shashthi" c="shashthi"/> instead added parsarg:kA-->

<sdef n="parsarg:0" c="0"/>
<sdef n="parsarg:ke" c="ke"/>
<sdef n="parsarg:se" c="se"/>
<sdef n="parsarg:de" c="de"/>

<sdef n="parsarg:meM" c="meM"/>
<sdef n="parsarg:meM_se" c="meM_se"/>
<sdef n="parsarg:kA" c="shashthi"/>
<sdef n="parsarg:kI" c="shashthi"/>
<sdef n="parsarg:para" c="para"/>

<sdef n="num:s" c="singular"/>
<sdef n="num:p" c="plural"/>
<sdef n="num:na" c="not applicable"/>

<sdef n="fnum:s" c="following noun singular"/>
<sdef n="fnum:p" c="following noun plural"/>

<sdef n="per:u" c="first"/>
<sdef n="per:m" c="second"/>

<sdef n="per:m_h1" c="second_honorific wuma jAo"/>
<sdef n="per:m_h2" c="second_honorific Apa jAyie"/>
<sdef n="per:m_h" c="second_honorific"/>
<sdef n="per:a" c="third"/>
<sdef n="per:a_h1" c="third_honorific1"/>
<sdef n="per:a_h2" c="third_honorific2"/>

<sdef n="tam:adv_iwa" c="adverbial iwa"/>
<sdef n="tam:adj_iwa" c="adjective iwa  (no change)"/>
<sdef n="tam:adj_iwa_hi" c="adjective iwa hi (no change)"/>
<sdef n="tam:adj_ela" c="adjective ela"/>
<sdef n="tam:iwa_rahe_ke_hE" c="iwa_rahe_ke_hE"/>
<sdef n="tam:iwa_rahe_ke_hau" c="iwa_rahe_ke_hau"/>
<sdef n="tam:iwa_rahe_ke_hava" c="iwa_rahe_ke_hava"/>
<sdef n="tam:iwa_rahe_ke_hEna" c="iwa_rahe_ke_hEna"/>
<sdef n="tam:iwa_rahe_ke_hai" c="iwa_rahe_ke_hai"/>
<sdef n="tam:iwa_rahe_ke_haina" c="iwa_rahe_ke_haina"/>

<sdef n="tam:adv_Uwa" c="adverbial Uwa"/>
<sdef n="tam:adj_Uwa" c="adjective Uwa"/>
<sdef n="tam:uwa_hi" c="uwa_hi"/>
<sdef n="tam:uwa_he" c="uwa_he"/>
<sdef n="tam:uwa_hai" c="uwa_hai"/>
<sdef n="tam:adv_uwa_ha" c="adverbial uwa_ha"/>
<sdef n="tam:adj_uwa_ha" c="adjective uwa_ha"/>

<sdef n="tam:uwa_haWina" c="uwa_haWina"/>

<sdef n="tam:adj_uwiwa" c="adjective uwiwa"/>
<sdef n="tam:uwiwa_hi" c="uwiwa_hi"/>
<sdef n="tam:uwiwa_he" c="uwiwa_he"/>
<sdef n="tam:uwiwa_hai" c="uwiwa_hai"/>

<sdef n="tam:uwiwa_ha" c="uwiwa_haWina"/>
<sdef n="tam:uwiwa_haWina" c="uwiwa_haWina"/>
<sdef n="tam:uwa_leli" c="uwa_leli"/>
<sdef n="tam:uwa_lela" c="uwa_lela"/>
<sdef n="tam:uwa_lele" c="uwa_lele"/>
<sdef n="tam:uwa_lelaWina" c="uwa_lelaWina"/>
<sdef n="tam:uwa_lelai" c="uwa_lelai"/>
<sdef n="tam:uwbai" c="uwbai"/>

<sdef n="tam:adj_wA_huA" c="adjective (kqxanwa) Rising sun"/>
<sdef n="tam:adj_yA_huA" c="adjective ed/en -- He is a changed person now -- "/>
<sdef n="tam:we_rahanA_hE" c="adverbial we_rahanA_hE (no change)"/>
<sdef n="tam:imper" c="imperative(AjFArWaka)"/>
<sdef n="tam:subj" c="subjunctive"/>

<sdef n="tam:nA" c="nA"/>
<sdef n="tam:wA" c="wA"/>
<sdef n="tam:yA" c="yA"/>
<sdef n="tam:yA1" c="yA1"/>
<sdef n="tam:kara" c="kara"/>
<sdef n="tam:gA" c="gA"/>
<sdef n="tam:hE" c="hE"/>
<sdef n="tam:WA" c="WA"/>
<sdef n="tam:0" c="0"/>
</sdefs>

<pardefs>

    <pardef n="prawyaya">
        <e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:prawyaya"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="parsarg">
        <e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:prsg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="conjunct">
        <e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:cnj"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="laik/A__n">
        <e><p><l>A</l><r>A<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>A</l><r>A<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ana</l><r>A<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ana</l><r>A<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>avana</l><r>A<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ave</l><r>A<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>I</l><r>A<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ave</l><r>A<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="kiwAb/a__n">
        <e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>a</l><r>a<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>bana</l><r>a<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="kiss/A__n">
        <e><p><l>A</l><r>A<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>e</l><r>A<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>e</l><r>A<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="bUdh/A__n">
        <e><p><l>A</l><r>A<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>iyA</l><r>A<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>vana</l><r>A<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>iyana</l><r>A<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ana</l><r>A<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:ne"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    

<e lm="laik"><i>laik</i><par n="laik/A__n"/></e>
<e lm="cauki"><i>cauki</i><par n="laik/A__n"/></e>
<e lm="kiss"><i>kiss</i><par n="kiss/A__n"/></e>
<e lm="hiss"><i>hiss</i><par n="kiss/A__n"/></e>
<e lm="kiwAb"><i>kiwAb</i><par n="kiwAb/a__n"/></e>
<e lm="hisAb"><i>hisAb</i><par n="kiwAb/a__n"/></e>
<e lm="bUdh"><i>bUdh</i><par n="bUdh/A__n"/></e>
